Utah statutes.
59-2-311.   Completion and delivery of assessment book -- Signed statement
required -- Contents of signed statement -- Adjustment of assessment in
assessment book.
(1)  Prior to May 22 each year, the assessor shall complete and deliver the
assessment book to the county auditor.
(2)  The assessor shall subscribe and sign a statement in the assessment book
substantially as follows:
I, ____, the assessor of ____ County, do swear that before May 22,
_______(year), I made diligent inquiry and examination, and either personally
or by deputy, established the value of all of the property within the county
subject to assessment by me; that the property has been assessed on the
assessment book equally and uniformly according to the best of my judgment,
information, and belief at its fair market value; that I have faithfully
complied with all the duties imposed on the assessor under the revenue laws
including the requirements of Section 59-2-303.1; and that I have not imposed
any unjust or double assessments through malice or ill will or otherwise, or
allowed anyone to escape a just and equal assessment through favor or reward,
or otherwise.
(3)  Before completing and delivering the assessment book under Subsection
(1), the assessor shall adjust the assessment of property in the assessment
book to reflect an adjustment in the taxable value of any property if the
adjustment in taxable value is made:
(a)  by the county board of equalization under Section 59-2-1004.5; and
(b)  on or before May 15.
